Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-497] Educational information. The
agent for the power of attorney for special education or educational
representative is authorized to make educational decisions for a student and
has the same rights as the student to request, receive, examine, copy, and
consent to the disclosure of the individualized education plan or any other
educational records. [L 2008, c 182, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next